Washington statutes.
RCW 7.44.021

Arrest and bail—Bond.

Upon such affidavit and complaint being filed, the clerk shall issue an order of arrest and bail, directed to the sheriff, which shall be issued, served, and returned in all respects as such orders in other cases; before such order shall issue the plaintiff shall file in the office of the clerk a bond, with sufficient surety, to be approved by the clerk, conditioned that the plaintiff will pay the defendant such damages and costs as he or she shall wrongfully sustain by reason of the action, which surety shall justify as provided by law.

[ 2011 c 336 s 207; 1957 c 51 s 10; 1891 c 42 s 2. Formerly RCW 7.44.020, part.]

NOTES:

Corporate surety—Insurance: Chapter 48.28 RCW.